Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0145.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13a. (1) An employer shall not do any of the following: (a) Require as a condition of employment, nondisclosure by include in a written policy a statement, or otherwise implement or engage in a practice that prohibits or discourages an employee of his or her from disclosing the employee's wages. (b) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document which that purports to deny an employee the right to disclose his or her the employee's wages. (c) Discharge, formally discipline, or otherwise discriminate against for job advancement an employee who discloses his or her the employee's wages. (d) Ask an individual seeking employment for information regarding the individual's past wages, fringe benefits, credit score, or credit history or otherwise seek information regarding the individual's past wages, fringe benefits, credit score, or credit history. This subdivision does not apply to any of the following: (i) An employer or agent of an employer that is required by law or by a self-regulatory organization as that term is defined in section 78c(a)(26) of the securities exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78c, to use an individual's past wages, fringe benefits, credit score, or credit history for employment purposes, including, but not limited to, bonding requirements. (ii) An employer or agent of an employer that is a financial institution, or is an affiliate or subsidiary of the financial institution, that accepts deposits that are insured by a federal agency. (iii) An employer or agent of an employer that is an entity, or is an affiliate of the entity, that is registered as a broker-dealer or investment adviser under the uniform securities act (2002), 2008 PA 551, MCL 451.2101 to 451.2703, or federal law.